Utah statutes.
17B-1-622.   Amendment and increase of individual fund budgets.
(1)  After holding the hearing referred to in Section 17B-1-621, the board of
trustees may, by resolution, amend the budgets of the funds proposed to be
increased, so as to make all or part of the increases, both estimated revenues
and appropriations, which were the proper subject of consideration at the
hearing.
(2)  The board of trustees may not adopt an amendment to the current year
budgets of any of the funds established in Section 17B-1-605 after the last
day of the fiscal year.
